Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.070

Informational document.

International student exchange organizations that have agreed to provide services to place students in the state shall provide an informational document, in English, to each student, host family, and superintendent of the school district in which the student is being placed. The document shall be provided before placement and shall include the following:

(1) An explanation of the services to be performed by the organization for the student, host family, and school district;

(2) A summary of this chapter prepared by the secretary of state;

(3) Telephone numbers that the student, host family, and school district may call for assistance. The telephone numbers shall include, at minimum, an in-state telephone number for the organization, and the telephone numbers of the organization's national headquarters, if any, the United States Information Agency, and the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1991 c 128 s 7.]